Maryland, session 2026, HB0443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–1013.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SMALL EVENT CENTER” MEANS A VENUE THAT
OPERATES ON A PER–EVENT BASIS OR ON A LIMITED SCHEDULE AND DOES NOT
MAINTAIN STANDARD DAILY HOURS OF OPERATION.
– 1 –

Ch. 838 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) THERE IS A CLASS B–SEC (SMALL EVENT CENTER) BEER, WINE, AND
LIQUOR LICENSE.
(C) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE FOR USE IN A SMALL EVENT
CENTER THAT HAS KITCHEN AND DINING FACILITIES TO ACCOMMODATE BETWEEN
75 AND 125 110 INDIVIDUALS, INCLUSIVE.
(D) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION TO INDIVIDUALS ATTENDING AN
EVENT AT THE SMALL EVENT CENTER DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE.
(E) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE MORE THAN:
(1) 24 LICENSES IN A LICENSE YEAR; OR
(2) 3 LICENSES TO APPLY IN EACH STATE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT IN
THE COUNTY AT ANY ONE TIME.
(F) THE SMALL EVENT CENTER SHALL HAVE:
(1) FOR A SMALL EVENT CENTER APPROVED FOR OR UNDER
CONSTRUCTION, A MINIMUM CAPITAL INVESTMENT, NOT INCLUDING THE COST OF
LAND, BUILDINGS, OR LEASING, OF $500,000 $350,000 FOR SMALL EVENT CENTER
DINING FACILITIES AND KITCHEN EQUIPMENT; AND
(2) FOR A SMALL EVENT CENTER THAT IS OPEN TO THE PUBLIC FOR
EVENTS, A MINIMUM APPRAISED VALUE, NOT INCLUDING THE COST OF LAND,
BUILDINGS, OR LEASING, OF $350,000 FOR SMALL EVENT CENTER DINING
FACILITIES AND KITCHEN EQUIPMENT; AND
(3) FOOD AVAILABLE DURING THE HOURS OF OPERATION FOR AN
EVENT.
(G) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR DURING THE
HOURS AND DAYS AS SET OUT FOR A CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
UNDER § 26–2004 OF THIS TITLE, SUBJECT TO COUNTY USE AND OCCUPANCY LAWS
FOR HOURS OF OPERATION.
(H) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS $3,500.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 838
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –